Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB526.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 21A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Supreme Court has power to provide for the organization, governance, and
Page 1 of 3
HB052610.100 - 1831 - XXXX 2/13/2026 9:48 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 526/GA
membership of the bar of Kentucky, and to adopt rules and regulations to govern
the conduct and activity of the bar and its members, except that no member of the
bar, without the member's annual written consent, shall be required to join or pay
membership dues to any association or entity beyond payment of fees required to
support the costs associated with:
(a) Admission to the bar; and
(b) Discipline of members of the bar.
(2) For purposes of this section, a member of the bar is any attorney licensed to
practice law in Kentucky.
Section 2. KRS 21A.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding Section 1 of this Act[KRS 21A.160], for a period of thirty (30)
days following the filing of a criminal or civil action, or claim for damages, or a
traffic citation, injury, accident, or disaster, an attorney or an attorney referral
service[ shall be subject to the following prohibition. An attorney or an attorney
referral service] shall not directly solicit, or knowingly permit another person to
directly solicit on[ his or its] behalf of the attorney or the attorney referral service,
a victim of the accident or disaster, or a relative of the victim, for the purpose of
obtaining professional employment relating to a criminal or civil action[,] or claim
for damages[,] arising out of the traffic citation, injury, accident, or disaster.
(2) Notwithstanding Section 1 of this Act[KRS 21A.160], an attorney shall not
knowingly accept a referral from an attorney referral service when that referral has
resulted from the attorney referral service violating the prohibition established in
subsection (1) of this section.
Section 3. KRS 21A.310 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) ]Notwithstanding Section 1 of this Act[KRS 21A.160], any person violating any
provision of KRS 21A.300:
(1) Shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor; and[.]
Page 2 of 3
HB052610.100 - 1831 - XXXX 2/13/2026 9:48 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 526/GA
(2) [The Kentucky Supreme Court ]May be disciplined by the Kentucky Supreme
Court[discipline any attorney who violates any provision of KRS 21A.300.
(3) A penalty may be imposed on an attorney pursuant to subsection (1) of this section,
subsection (2) of this section, or both subsections].
Section 4. The following KRS section is repealed:
21A.160 Organization and control of state bar vested in Supreme Court.
Section 5. Sections 1 to 4 of this Act take effect July 1, 2027.
Page 3 of 3
HB052610.100 - 1831 - XXXX 2/13/2026 9:48 AM GA